Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-15,128
Noncontrolled affiliates; treatment.

Noncontrolled affiliates of housing agencies shall not, by virtue of their affiliation with such local housing agencies, become subject to the laws of this state applicable to public agencies and their governing bodies, including, but not limited to, laws pertaining to public disclosure of records, open meetings, minimum wage rates applicable to government contracts and employees, procurement of goods and services, and laws relating to public employees.

Laws 1999, LB 105, § 57.